Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-602
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the Certified Nurse Midwifery Practice Act is necessary to safeguard public life, health, safety, and welfare, to assure the highest degree of professional conduct by practitioners of certified nurse midwifery, and to insure the availability of high quality midwifery services to persons desiring such services.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1739;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 214.